Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 69, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used  in this section and section 2 [ of this 2024 Act ], chapter 69, Oregon Laws
2024:
(a) “Authorized service provider” means:
(A) A person that has an arrangement with an original equipment manufacturer under which:
(i) The original equipment manufacturer grants a license to the person for the use  of, or other-
wise permits the person to use,  the original equipment manufacturer’s trade name, service mark or
other proprietary identification for the purpose of offering the  services of diagnosing, maintaining,
repairing or updating consumer [ electronic] equipment; or
(ii) The person offers the services of  diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating consumer
[electronic] equipment on  behalf of the original equipment manufacturer or under the original
equipment manufacturer’s warranty; or
(B) An original equipment manufacturer, but only in instances where the  original equipment
manufacturer does not have an arrangement described in subparagraph (A)  of this paragraph and
offers the services  of diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating consumer [ electronic] equipment
that the original equipment manufacturer makes or sells.
(b) “Complex rehabilitation technology” means an individually configured manual  wheel-
chair system, power wheelchair system, adaptive seating  system, alternative positioning
system, adaptive stroller, standing frame or gait trainer or  a specifically designed option or
accessory for  a manual wheelchair system, power wheelchair system, adaptive seating sys-
tem, alternative positioning system, adaptive stroller, standing frame or gait trainer that:
(A) Is durable medical equipment;
(B) Is specifically configured for an individual to meet the individual’s unique medical,
physical and functional needs for  basic and instrumental activities of daily living, including
employment;
(C) Is medically necessary to promote an individual’s mobility in the home or community
or to avoid the individual’s hospitalization or institutionalization;
Enrolled Senate Bill 550 (SB 550-INTRO) Page 1
(D) Serves a medical purpose and is generally not useful to an  individual in the absence
of disability, illness or injury; and
(E) Requires services that a qualified complex rehabilitation technology technician  or a
health care professional provides, such as a medical evaluation or assessment of the  indi-
vidual, to ensure that the complex rehabilitation technology is:
(i) Appropriately designed, configured and used; and
(ii) Consistent with the individual’s medical condition,  physical and functional needs and
capacities, body size, period of need and intended use.
[(b)] (c)  “Consumer [ electronic] equipment” means a product that  is:
(A) Electronic equipment that:
[(A)] (i)  Functions, in whole or in  part, on the basis of digital electronics that are embedded
within or attached to the product;
[(B)] (ii) Is tangible personal property;
[(C)] (iii) Is generally used for personal, family or household purposes;
[(D)] (iv)  Is sold, used or supplied in this state one year or more  after the product was first
manufactured and one year or more after the product was first sold or used in this state; and
[(E)] (v) Might be, but is not necessarily, capable of attachment to  or installation in real
property[ .];
(B) An electric wheelchair; or
(C) Complex rehabilitation technology.
[(c)] (d) “Documentation”  means any manual, diagram, reporting output, service code de-
scription, schematic diagram,  security code, password or other guidance or information that enables
a person to diagnose, maintain, repair or update consumer [ electronic] equipment.
[(d)] (e) “Fair and reasonable terms” means terms under which an  original equipment manufac-
turer:
(A) Makes documentation available at no charge, except that  the original equipment manufac-
turer may charge for the reasonable and actual costs of printing, preparing and sending or preparing
and sending documentation that a person requests in print;
(B) Makes tools for diagnosing, maintaining,  repairing or updating consumer [ electronic] equip-
ment available at no charge and without impeding access to the tools or the efficient  and cost-
effective use of the tools, except that the original equipment  manufacturer may charge for the
reasonable and actual costs of preparing and shipping a physical tool that a person requests; and
(C) Makes parts available directly or through an authorized service provider to:
(i) An  independent repair provider or an owner at costs and on terms that are equivalent to the
most favorable costs and terms at which the  original equipment manufacturer offers the parts to an
authorized service provider and that:
(I) Account for any discount,  rebate, convenient means of delivery, means of enabling fully re-
stored and updated functionality, rights of use or other incentive or  preference the original equip-
ment manufacturer offers to an authorized service provider, or  that impose any additional cost,
burden or impediment on an independent  repair provider or an owner that the original equipment
manufacturer also imposes on an authorized service provider;
(II) Do not impose a substantial condition, obligation or restriction that is not reasonably  nec-
essary to enable an independent repair provider or an owner to  diagnose, maintain, repair or update
consumer [ electronic] equipment that the original equipment manufacturer makes or sells; and
(III) Do not require an independent repair provider or an owner to  enter into an arrangement
described in paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection; and
(ii) All authorized service providers  that the original equipment manufacturer permits, by con-
tract or otherwise, to sell parts to independent repair providers and owners, without  imposing:
(I) [ Imposing] Allocation  limitations or advertising restrictions upon the authorized service
provider as a means of retaliation or as a means of hindering the authorized  service provider in
selling parts by any means; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 550 (SB 550-INTRO) Page 2
(II) [Imposing] A substantial condition, obligation or restriction that  is not reasonably necessary
to enable an  independent repair provider or an owner to diagnose, maintain, repair or update con-
sumer [ electronic] equipment that the original equipment manufacturer makes or sells.
[(e)] (f) “Independent repair provider” means a person that:
(A) Engages in the business of diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating consumer  [ elec-
tronic] equipment in this state but is not an authorized service provider; and
(B) Possesses a valid and  unexpired certification that demonstrates that the person has the
technical capabilities and competence necessary to safely, securely and reliably repair  consumer
[electronic] equipment  in accordance with widely accepted standards, such as a Wireless Industry
Service Excellence Certification, an A+ certification from the Computing Technology  Industry As-
sociation,  a  National Appliance Service Technician Certification or another certification that an
original equipment manufacturer accepts as evidence that the person can perform safe, secure  and
reliable repairs to consumer [ electronic] equipment that the original equipment  manufacturer makes
or sells.
[(f)] (g) “Original equipment manufacturer” means a person that engages in the  business of
selling, leasing or otherwise supplying to another person new consumer [ electronic] equipment  that
the person makes or has made on the person’s behalf.
[(g)] (h) “Owner” means a person that owns or leases from a  lessor consumer [ electronic]
equipment that the person or the lessor purchased or used in this state.
[(h)] (i) “Part” means a new or used replacement component for consumer [ electronic] equipment
that an  original equipment manufacturer makes available for the purpose of maintaining, repairing
or updating consumer [ electronic] equipment that the original equipment manufacturer makes or
sells.
[(i)] (j) “Parts  pairing” means a manufacturer’s practice of using software to identify component
parts through a unique identifier.
[(j)] (k) “Tool” means software, a hardware implement or an apparatus by means of which a
person can  diagnose, maintain, repair or update consumer [ electronic] equipment , including any
software, or a mechanism that provisions, programs or  pairs[ ,] a new part, calibrates functionality
or performs another function that is necessary to update or restore a product  to a fully functional
condition.
[(k)] (L) “Trade secret” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646.461.
[(L)(A)] (m)(A)  “Video game console” means a computing device, and components and  periph-
erals for the computing device, that is intended primarily for playing interactive video games.
(B) “Video game  console” does not include a general purpose personal computer that has the
capability to run video games alongside other computing functions.
(2)(a) An original equipment manufacturer shall  make available to an owner or an independent
repair provider on fair and reasonable terms any documentation, tool, part or other device  or im-
plement that the original equipment manufacturer makes available to  an authorized service provider
for the purpose of diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating consumer  [ electronic] equipment
that the original equipment manufacturer makes or sells and that is sold or used in this state.
(b) For consumer [ electronic] equipment that is manufactured for the first  time, and first sold or
used in this state, after January 1, 2025, an original equipment  manufacturer may not use parts
pairing to:
(A) Prevent or inhibit an independent  repair provider or an owner from installing or enabling
the function of an otherwise functional replacement part or a component  of consumer [ electronic]
equipment, including a replacement part or a component that the original equipment manufacturer
has not approved;
(B) Reduce the functionality or performance of consumer [ electronic] equipment; or
(C) Cause consumer [ electronic] equipment to display misleading alerts or warnings,  which the
owner cannot immediately dismiss, about unidentified parts.
(3) This section does not:
Enrolled Senate Bill 550 (SB 550-INTRO) Page 3
(a) Require  an original equipment manufacturer to disclose a trade secret or license intellectual
property, including copyrights or patents, to an independent repair provider  or an owner except as
necessary to provide,  on fair and reasonable terms, any documentation, tool, part or other device
or implement used to diagnose, maintain, repair or update consumer [ electronic] equipment.
(b) Alter the terms of any agreement or  arrangement between an original equipment manufac-
turer and an authorized service provider including, but not  limited to, the authorized service
provider’s performance or provision of warranty service or recall repair work on  the original
equipment manufacturer’s behalf under the agreement or arrangement, except that any provision  in
the agreement or arrangement that purports to waive, restrict or limit  the original equipment
manufacturer’s compliance with this section is void and unenforceable.
(c) Impose liability upon an  original equipment manufacturer for any bodily injury or damage
to consumer [ electronic] equipment that an independent  repair provider or an owner causes while
diagnosing, maintaining, repairing or updating the consumer [ electronic] equipment using documen-
tation, tools, parts or other devices or implements  that the original equipment manufacturer made
available on fair and reasonable  terms to an authorized service provider, an independent repair
provider or an owner before  the date of the diagnosis, maintenance, repair or update, except that
an original equipment  manufacturer remains liable to the extent that the laws of this state provide
for strict liability for defects in the design or manufacture of the consumer [ electronic] equipment.
(d) Require an original equipment manufacturer to make available special documentation,  tools,
parts or other devices or  implements that would disable or override, without an owner’s authori-
zation, anti-theft or privacy security measures that the owner sets  for consumer [ electronic] equip-
ment.
(e) Require an original equipment manufacturer to provide to an independent repair provider
or an owner any part that the equipment manufacturer no longer makes or no  longer provides to
authorized service providers.
(f) Prohibit parts pairing for the purpose of reducing the functionality of a  battery if a thermal
event occurs.
(g) Apply to:
(A) A person that is engaged in the business  of manufacturing or assembling new motor vehicles
or in the business of selling or leasing new motor vehicles and  offering the service of diagnosing,
maintaining or repairing motor vehicles or motor vehicle engines under the terms of  a franchise
agreement, or to the person’s products or services;
(B) A product or service or equipment that:
(i) Has never been available for retail sale to a consumer;
(ii) Is a medical device, as defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and  Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 301
et seq.,  other than an electric wheelchair or complex rehabilitation technology;  [ or]
(iii) Is  a digital electronic product, software, control equipment or a related product , other
than an electric wheelchair or complex rehabilitation technology, that is manufactured for , or
is a service provided for , use in diagnosis or monitoring in an acute care hospital, a long term care
facility  such  as a nursing home or skilled nursing facility, a physician’s office, an urgent care center,
an outpatient clinic, a home setting where health care is provided by or  at the direction of a li-
censed health care provider or an emergency medical service facility or for use in diagnosis  or
monitoring at a site where health care is routinely delivered on premises that  are not otherwise a
health care facility, such as a medical clinic within a school;
[(iii)] (iv) Provides heat, ventilation or air conditioning or recharges refrigerant gases;
[(iv)] (v)  Is a system, mechanism or series of  mechanisms that generates, stores or combines
generation and storage of electrical energy from solar radiation;
[(v)] (vi) Is a video game console; or
[(vi)] (vii) Is a system that stores electrical energy for a period  of time and transmits the energy
after storage, that is interconnected with a transmission or distribution system and that is  approved
by an electric utility or located on a customer’s  side of an electric utility meter in accordance with
an applicable utility tariff or interconnection agreement;
Enrolled Senate Bill 550 (SB 550-INTRO) Page 4
(C) A vehicle, an engine, equipment or a power source, or a person that engages directly  in, or
acts for or is subject  to the control of another person that engages directly in, manufacturing, as-
sembling, distributing, selling, importing for resale,  maintaining, servicing or repairing a vehicle, an
engine, equipment or a power source with any of the following characteristics:
(i) An internal combustion  engine, including the engine’s fuel system or other power sources
such as an electric battery or a fuel cell, that is not used in a motor vehicle or  in a vehicle used
solely for competition or that is  not subject to standards of performance for stationary sources or
emission standards for new motor vehicles or new motor  vehicle engines under the federal Clean
Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7411 and 7521 et seq.;
(ii) A vehicle or equipment that  is not a motor vehicle or a vehicle used solely for competition
and is powered by an engine described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph, together  with
any tools, technology, attachments, accessories, components or repair parts for the vehicle,  equip-
ment or engine;
(iii) An internal combustion engine or another power source, including  an electric battery or a
fuel cell, that  is not used in a motor vehicle, in a vehicle used solely for competition or in a vehicle
or equipment  described in sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph, or equipment that is powered
by the internal combustion engine or other power source, together with tools, technology,  attach-
ments, accessories, components  or repair parts for the internal combustion engine, the other power
source or the equipment; or
(iv) An engine or other power source, including an electric battery or a fuel  cell, that is used
for propulsion or power generation in a maritime environment or a waterway, together  with any
tools, technology, attachments, accessories,  components or repair parts for the engine or the other
power source;
(D) A manufacturer, distributor or dealer of any off-road equipment or of tools, technology,  at-
tachments, accessories, components or repair parts for off-road equipment  including, but not limited
to, farm and utility tractors, farm implements and machinery, equipment  for forestry, industry, util-
ities, construction,  mining or maintaining a yard, garden or turf, outdoor power equipment and
portable generators, vehicles used in marine  environments, for sports, recreation and racing, all-
terrain vehicles, power  tools and stand-alone or integrated mobile or stationary internal combustion
engines or power sources such as generator sets and battery or fuel cell power; or
(E) Electric toothbrushes.
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 69, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Certification entity” means a person that engages in evaluating and  certifying the technical
capabilities and competence of independent repair providers in accordance with  standards that the
person adopts or that an original equipment manufacturer specifies.
(b) “Repair certification” means evidence that an independent repair provider  has the technical
and financial capability and competence necessary to safely,  securely and reliably repair digital
electronic equipment in accordance with standards that a certification entity specifies.
(2) Before repairing  consumer [ electronic] equipment, an authorized service provider and an in-
dependent repair provider shall:
(a) Post at the authorized service provider’s or independent repair provider’s place of business
or on the authorized service provider’s  or independent repair provider’s website, or provide directly
to customers, a notice that:
(A) Specifies  the steps the authorized service provider or independent repair provider takes to
ensure the customer’s privacy and the security of consumer [ electronic] equipment  the customer en-
trusts to the authorized service provider or independent repair provider;
(B) Recommends steps the consumer  should take to ensure privacy and security, including but
not limited to:
(i) Backing up data from the  consumer [ electronic] equipment onto another device and perma-
nently erasing the data from the consumer [ electronic] equipment the customer  will bring in for re-
pair;
Enrolled Senate Bill 550 (SB 550-INTRO) Page 5
(ii) Sharing only those passwords or access to functions that are necessary to effect the repair;
and
(iii) Logging out of applications, closing websites and deleting caches  or records of application
or website use that have sensitive  information or that otherwise pose a security risk, such as fi-
nancial applications or websites, electronic mail or messaging or social media accounts;
(C) Informs the customer about the customer’s rights  to privacy under the laws of this state;
and
(D) Informs the customer about any potential safety concerns about the parts being installed.
(b) Display all of the authorized service provider’s or independent repair provider’s repair  cer-
tifications.
(3) Before repairing consumer  [ electronic] equipment, an independent repair provider shall dis-
close to each customer:
(a) That the independent repair provider is not an authorized service provider; and
(b) Whether replacement parts the independent repair provider incorporates into repairs  are
used replacement parts or are replacement parts provided by suppliers other  than the original
equipment manufacturer of the consumer [ electronic] equipment.
SECTION 3.
 Section 4, chapter 69, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  The Attorney General shall submit not later than December 31, 2025, a report to an
interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly concerned with consumer protection in which the
Attorney General specifies the number and nature of complaints from owners and independent repair
providers  the  Attorney General received within the previous two years concerning original equip-
ment manufacturers that did not provide upon request documentation,  tools, parts or other devices
or implements necessary to diagnose, maintain, repair or update consumer [ electronic] equipment
that the original equipment manufacturer makes or sells.
SECTION 4.
 Section 6, chapter 69, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) As used in this section, “cell  phone” means a handheld product that includes a bat-
tery, microphone, speaker and display and that is designed to send and  receive transmissions
through a cellular radiotelephone service.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, section 1 [ of this  2024 Act ], chapter 69,
Oregon Laws 2024, applies to consumer [ electronic] equipment that is sold  in this state or is in use
in this state on or after [ the effective date of this 2024 Act ] January 1, 2025 .
(3) Section 1 [ of this 2024 Act ], chapter 69, Oregon Laws 2024,  does not apply to:
(a) A cell phone that was manufactured for the first time, and  first sold or used in this state,
before July 1, 2021; or
(b) Consumer [ electronic] equipment other than a cell phone that was manufactured  for the first
time, and first sold or used in this state, before July 1, 2015.
Enrolled Senate Bill 550 (SB 550-INTRO) Page 6
Passed by Senate February 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 550 (SB 550-INTRO) Page 7